Utah statutes.
63F-1-701.   Utah Public Notice Website -- Establishment and administration.

(1)  As used in this part:

(a)  "Division" means the Division of Archives and Records Service of the Department of Administrative Services.

(b)  "Public body" has the same meaning as provided under Section 52-4-103.

(c)  "Public information" means a public body's public notices, minutes, audio recordings, and other materials that are required to be posted to the website under Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, or other statute or state agency rule.

(d)  "Website" means the Utah Public Notice Website created under this section.

(2)  There is created the Utah Public Notice Website to be administered by the Division of Archives and Records Service.

(3)  The website shall consist of an Internet website provided to assist the public to find posted public information.

(4)  The division, with the technical assistance of the Department of Technology Services, shall create the website which shall:

(a)  allow a public body, or other certified entity, to easily post any public information;

(b)  allow the public to search the public information by:

(i)  public body name;

(ii)  date of posting of the notice;

(iii)  date of any meeting or deadline included as part of the public information; and

(iv)  any other criteria approved by the division;

(c)  allow the public to search and view past, archived public information;

(d)  allow a person to subscribe to receive updates and notices associated with a public body or a particular type of public information;

(e)  be easily accessible by the public from the State of Utah home page;

(f)  have a unique and simplified website address;

(g)  be directly accessible via a link from the main page of the official state website; and

(h)  include other links, features, or functionality that will assist the public in obtaining and reviewing public information posted on the website, as may be approved by the division.

(5)  The division shall be responsible for:

(a)  establishing and maintaining the website, including the provision of equipment, resources, and personnel as is necessary;

(b)  providing a mechanism for public bodies or other certified entities to have access to the website for the purpose of posting and modifying public information; and

(c)  maintaining an archive of all public information posted to the website.

(6)  The timing for posting and the content of the public information posted to the website shall be the responsibility of the public body or other entity posting the public information.



Amended by Chapter 63, 2013 General Session

